test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-79olwma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Ver%b - olõma: # Verb (79) olõma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     olõma+V+Inf/mA: olõma
     olõma+V+Inf: ollaq
     olõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: olõ
     olõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [olõt, olõdõq]
     olõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [om, um]
     olõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: olõmiq
     olõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: olõtiq
     olõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [ommaq, ommavaq, ummaq, ummavaq]
     olõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Neg: [olõ-õiq, olõ-õi, olõ-iq, olõ-i]
     olõma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegI: olõq
     olõma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: olõ
     olõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oldas
     olõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Neg: [olda-aiq, olda-ai, olda-iq, olda-i]
     olõma+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegI: oldaq
     olõma+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegII: olda
     olõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Neg: [olda-as, olda-s]
     olõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: olli
     olõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [olliq, ollit, ollidõq]
     olõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [ollʼ, olle]
     olõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ollimiq
     olõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ollitiq
     olõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [olliq, ollivaq]
     olõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Neg: [olõ-õs, olõ-s]

     olõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: ollõv
     olõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: olõva
     olõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: olõvat
     olõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: olõvahe
     olõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: olõvaq
     olõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [olõvidõ, olõviidõ]
     olõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [olõvit, olõviid]
     olõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [olõvihe, olõviihe]
                    
     olõma+V+Act+PrfPrc: olnuq

     olõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: olnuq
     olõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: olnu
     olõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: olnut
     olõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: olnuhe
     olõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: olnuq
     olõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [olnuidõ, olnuisi]
     olõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [olnuid, olnuisi]
     olõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [olnuihe, olnuisihe]

     olõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [olt, oltu]
